Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202659-1608.04
State Settlement Cash Fund; created; use; investment; transfer.

(1) The State Settlement Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be maintained by the Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General. Except as otherwise provided by law, the fund shall consist of all recoveries received pursuant to the Consumer Protection Act, including any money, funds, securities, or other things of value in the nature of civil damages or other payment, except criminal penalties, whether such recovery is by way of verdict, judgment, compromise, or settlement in or out of court, or other final disposition of any case or controversy, or any other payments received on behalf of the state by the Department of Justice and administered by the Attorney General for the benefit of the state or the general welfare of its citizens, but excluding all funds held in a trust capacity where specific benefits accrue to specific individuals, organizations, or governments. The fund may be expended for any allowable legal purposes as determined by the Attorney General. Transfers from the State Settlement Cash Fund may be made at the direction of the Legislature to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund, the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund, the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund, the Financial Literacy Cash Fund, and the General Fund. To provide necessary financial accountability and management oversight, revenue from individual settlement agreements or other separate sources credited to the State Settlement Cash Fund may be tracked and accounted for within the state accounting system through the use of separate and distinct funds, subfunds, or any other available accounting mechanism specifically approved by the Accounting Administrator for use by the Department of Justice. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million five hundred thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on July 1, 2013, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible.

(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer eight hundred seventy-six thousand nine hundred ninety-eight dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million seven hundred fifty-six thousand six hundred thirty-nine dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the General Fund on or before June 30, 2019, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund on or before April 30, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(6) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred fifty thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund on or before July 9, 2018, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(7) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten thousand dollars from the State Settlement Cash Fund to the Legal Education for Public Service and Rural Practice Loan Repayment Assistance Fund on July 18, 2026, or as soon thereafter as administratively possible.

Laws 2006, LB 1061, § 4;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 34;

Laws 2010, LB190, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB549, § 8;

Laws 2013, LB199, § 26;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 26;

Laws 2018, LB945, § 14;

Laws 2024, LB1413, § 41;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 17;

Laws 2026, LB935, § 42.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.